Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
VOTING

7-107-201. Shareholders' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a shareholders' meeting, the corporation shall prepare a list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to be given notice of the meeting. The list shall be arranged by voting groups and within each voting group by class or series of shares, shall be alphabetical within each class or series, and shall show the address of, and the number of shares of each such class and series that are held by, each shareholder.

The shareholders' list must be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning the earlier of ten days before the meeting for which the list was prepared or two business days after notice of the meeting is given and continuing through the meeting, and any adjournment thereof:

At the corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the notice of the meeting in the city in which the meeting will be held; or

On a reasonably accessible electronic network if the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting. If the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that the list is available only to shareholders of the corporation.

A shareholder or an agent or attorney of the shareholder is entitled, on written demand, to inspect and, subject to sections 7-116-102 (3) and 7-116-103 (2) and (3), to copy the list during regular business hours and during the period it is available for inspection.

If the meeting is to be held at a place, the corporation shall make the shareholders' list available at the meeting, and any shareholder or an agent or attorney of the shareholder is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, the list must also be open to inspection during the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the corporation shall provide, with the notice of the meeting, all information required to access the list.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder or an agent or attorney of the shareholder to inspect the shareholders' list before or at the meeting or to copy the list, as permitted by subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office is located or, if the corporation has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the corporation has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver may, on application of the shareholder, summarily order the inspection or copying of the list at the corporation's expense and may postpone or adjourn the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

If a court orders inspection or copying of the shareholders' list pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection or copying of the list in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder or the agent or attorney of the shareholder to inspect or copy the shareholders' list:

The court shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder's costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred in obtaining the order;

The court may order the corporation to pay the shareholder for any damages the shareholder incurred; and

The court may grant the shareholder any other remedy afforded the shareholder by law.

If a court orders inspection or copying of the shareholders' list pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the court may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the list by the shareholder.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1317, § 19, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 2318, § 236, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2021:

(2), (3), and (7) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 167, § 14, effective April 19.

7-107-202. Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section or in the articles of incorporation, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote, and each fractional share is entitled to a corresponding fractional vote, on each matter voted on at a shareholders' meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

Except as otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction upon a finding that the purpose of this subsection (2) would not be violated in the circumstances presented to the court, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to be voted if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation.

Subsection (2) of this section does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to be voted after notice of redemption is delivered to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 770, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 168, § 15, effective April 19.

7-107-203. Proxies.

A shareholder may vote the shareholder's shares in person or by proxy.

Without limiting the manner in which a shareholder may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder, the following constitutes valid means of appointment:

A shareholder may appoint a proxy by signing an appointment form, either personally or by the shareholder's attorney-in-fact.

A shareholder may appoint a proxy by an electronic transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization, or similar agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the transmission. The transmission must set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the shareholder authorized the electronic transmission. If it is determined that an electronic transmission is valid, the person making that determination shall specify the information upon which the person relied.

An appointment of a proxy is effective against the corporation when received by the corporation, including receipt by the corporation of an appointment transmitted pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section. An appointment is valid for the term specified in the appointment form and, if no term is specified, is valid for eleven months unless the appointment is irrevocable under subsection (5) of this section.

A copy, facsimile, telecommunication, or other reliable reproduction of the document, including any electronic transmission, created pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be substituted or used in lieu of the original document for any and all purposes for which the original document could be used if the copy, facsimile, telecommunication, or other reproduction is a complete reproduction of the entire original document.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the shareholder unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of any of the following persons or their designees:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended credit to the corporation under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under section 7-107-302.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (5) of this section is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished, but such revocation does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless:

The corporation had notice that the appointment was coupled with that interest and notice that the interest is extinguished is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment; or

Other notice of the revocation of the appointment is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

The corporation shall not be required to recognize an appointment made irrevocable under subsection (5) of this section if it has received a writing revoking the appointment signed by the shareholder either personally or by the shareholder's attorney-in-fact, notwithstanding that the revocation may be a breach of an obligation of the shareholder to another person not to revoke the appointment. This provision shall not affect any claim such other person may have against the shareholder with respect to the revocation.

Unless an appointment otherwise provides, an appointment made irrevocable under subsection (5) of this section continues in effect after a transfer of the shares and a transferee takes the shares subject to the appointment; except that a transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if:

The transferee did not know of its existence when the transferee acquired the shares; and

The existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to section 7-107-205 and to any express limitation on the proxy's authority appearing on the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy's vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 770, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1318, § 20, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(6), (7)(a), (7)(b), and (9) amended, p. 1496, § 250, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3) and (9) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1927, § 31, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended and (4) R&RE, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 168, § 16, effective April 19.

7-107-204. Shares held by intermediaries and nominees.

A corporation's board of directors may establish a procedure by which a beneficial owner is recognized by the corporation in its records as the shareholder. The extent, terms, conditions, and limitations of this treatment must be specified in the procedure so established. To the extent that the beneficial owner is treated under the procedure as having rights or privileges that the shareholder otherwise would have, the shareholder does not have those rights or privileges.

The procedure described in subsection (1) of this section must specify:

The types of intermediaries or nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner, which may include rights or privileges other than voting;

The manner in which the procedure may be used by the intermediary or nominee;

The information that shall be provided by the intermediary or nominee when the procedure is used;

The period for which the intermediary's or nominee's use of the procedure is effective;

Requirements for notice to the corporation with respect to the arrangement, including any requirements for the deposit with the corporation of the beneficial ownership certificate;

The form and contents of the beneficial ownership certificate; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties thereby created.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 772, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

IP(2) amended, p. 2319, § 237, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1928, § 32, effective July 1, 2020.

7-107-205. Corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation and to give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation does not correspond to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation and to give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation;

Two or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the cotenants or fiduciaries and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the cotenants or fiduciaries; or

The acceptance of the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation is otherwise proper under rules established by the corporation that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection (2).

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory's authority to sign for the shareholder.

Neither the corporation nor the person authorized to count votes that accepts or rejects a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section is liable in damages for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 773, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1928, § 33, effective July 1, 2020.

7-107-206. Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless otherwise provided in articles 101 to 117 of this title or in the articles of incorporation, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter, but a quorum shall not consist of fewer than one-third of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, including the purpose of determining that a quorum exists, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or unless a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter other than the election of directors by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast within the voting group opposing the action, unless a greater number of affirmative votes is required by articles 101 to 117 of this title or the articles of incorporation.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than that specified in subsection (1) or (3) of this section is governed by section 7-107-208 (2).

The election of directors is governed by section 7-107-209.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 774, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-207. Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If articles 101 to 117 of this title or the articles of incorporation provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in section 7-107-206.

If articles 101 to 117 of this title or the articles of incorporation provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in section 7-107-206. One voting group may vote on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 774, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-208. Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation or, if authorized by the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the shareholders may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders or voting groups than is provided for by articles 101 to 117 of this title.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-209. Voting for directors - cumulative voting.

At each election for directors, every shareholder entitled to vote at such election has the right:

To vote, in person or by proxy, all of the shareholder's votes for as many persons as there are directors to be elected and for whose election the shareholder has a right to vote unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise; or

To the extent that the privilege of cumulative voting in the election of directors is in effect pursuant to the provisions of section 7-102-102 (3), to cumulate votes by multiplying the number of votes the shareholder is entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom the shareholder is entitled to vote and casting the product for a single candidate or distributing the product among two or more candidates.

The articles of incorporation may provide that shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a meeting unless:

The notice of the meeting or the proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A shareholder who has the right to cumulate votes gives notice to the corporation not less than forty-eight hours before the time set for the meeting of the shareholder's intent to cumulate votes during the meeting. If one shareholder gives the notice provided for in this paragraph (b), all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election shall be entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

If, before a meeting of shareholders at which directors are to be elected, the corporation receives notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section with respect to that meeting, then:

If such notice is received sufficiently early that the information required by paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section can be included, without significant additional expense, in the notice of the meeting or in a proxy statement accompanying the notice, the corporation shall include such information in that notice or proxy statement; or

If such notice is received later than contemplated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the corporation may take such other action as it may deem appropriate to provide notice, to the voting group or groups that are affected by the shareholder's notice, that cumulative voting is authorized at the meeting for such voting group or groups; and, in any event, the corporation shall cause an announcement to be made at the meeting, before the taking of any vote with respect to which cumulative voting is in effect, that cumulative voting is authorized at the meeting.

In an election of directors, that number of candidates equaling the number of directors to be elected, having the highest number of votes cast in favor of their election, are elected to the board of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.